Nevada, session 83, SB178.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee the sum of
$5,000,000 for allocation to Mondays Dark, Inc. for the building of
a facility in the Las Vegas, Nevada, area to provide space for the
provision of educational, mental health and other services to the
community.
2. Allocation of the money appropriated by subsection 1 is
contingent upon matching money being obtained by Mondays Dark,
Inc., including, without limitation, gifts, grants and donations to
Mondays Dark, Inc. from private and public sources of money other
than the appropriation made by subsection 1, for the building of
such a facility. The Interim Finance Committee shall not direct the
transfer of any portion of the money appropriated by subsection 1
until Mondays Dark, Inc. submits to the Committee proof
-
*SB178*

– 2 –
satisfactory that matching money in an equivalent amount has been
committed.
3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
Mondays Dark, Inc. agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Mondays Dark,
Inc. through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Mondays Dark,
Inc. through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of Mondays Dark, Inc., regardless of their form or
location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an
audit of the use of the money appropriated by subsection 1.
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB178*